Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1708.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 9, chapter 4, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 9-500.54, to read: START_STATUTE9-500.54. Cities and towns; property; immigration enforcement; prohibition; definition A. notwithstanding any other law, property that is owned by a city or town in this state may not be used, occupied, leased, loaned or otherwise made available, temporarily or permanently, for any civil immigration enforcement activity or operation unless the civil immigration enforcement activity or operation is conducted pursuant to a valid judicial warrant SPECIFYING that the activity or operation may be conducted at a particular property. B. A parking lot, parking garage or vacant lot that is OWNED BY A CITY OR TOWN IN THIS STATE MAY NOT BE USED as a staging area, processing location or operations base for civil immigration enforcement. C. Within thirty days after the effective date of this section, the city or town shall provide designated signage at each entrance of property that is owned by the city or town in this state and that is accessible to the public stating that the property is publicly owned and may not be used for civil immigration enforcement activities or operations by immigration enforcement officers without a valid judicial warrant. D. A person who is on any property that is owned by a city or town in this state may not be questioned, detained or arrested by an immigration enforcement officer unless the immigration enforcement officer presents a valid judicial warrant that is applicable to the person. E. For the purposes of this section, "staging area" means an area that is used to ASSEMBLE, mobilize and deploy vehicles, equipment or materials and any related personnel for the purposes of carrying out civil immigration enforcement OPERATIONS. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 11, chapter 2, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-269.31, to read: START_STATUTE11-269.31. Counties; property; immigration enforcement; prohibition; definition A. notwithstanding any other law, property that is owned by a county in this state may not be used, occupied, leased, loaned or otherwise made available, temporarily or permanently, for any civil immigration enforcement activity or operation unless the civil immigration enforcement activity or operation is conducted pursuant to a valid judicial warrant SPECIFYING that the activity or operation may be conducted at a particular property. B. A pARKING LOT, PARKING GARAGE OR VACANT LOT that is OWNED BY A county IN THIS STATE MAY NOT BE USED as a staging area, processing location or operations base for civil immigration enforcement. C. Within thirty days after the effective date of this section, the county shall provide designated signage at each entrance of property that is owned by the county in this state and that is accessible to the public stating that the property is publicly owned and may not be used for civil immigration enforcement activities or operations by immigration enforcement officers without a valid judicial warrant. D. A person who is on any property that is owned by a county may not be questioned, detained or arrested by an immigration enforcement officer unless the immigration enforcement officer presents a valid judicial warrant that is applicable to the person. E. For the purposes of this section, "staging area" means an area that is used to ASSEMBLE, mobilize and deploy vehicles, equipment or materials and any related personnel for the purposes of carrying out civil immigration enforcement OPERATIONS. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 41, chapter 4, article 7, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-807, to read: START_STATUTE41-807. State owned property; immigration enforcement; prohibition; definition A. notwithstanding any other law, property that is owned by this state may not be used, occupied, leased, loaned or otherwise made available, temporarily or permanently, for any civil immigration enforcement activity or operation unless the civil immigration enforcement activity or operation is conducted pursuant to a valid judicial warrant SPECIFYING that the activity or operation may be conducted at a particular property. B. A pARKING LOT, PARKING GARAGE OR VACANT LOT that is OWNED BY THIS STATE MAY NOT BE USED as a staging area, processing location or operations base for civil immigration enforcement. C. Within thirty days after the effective date of this section, the department shall provide designated signage at each entrance of property that is owned by this state and that is accessible to the public stating that the property is publicly owned and may not be used for civil immigration enforcement activities or operations by immigration enforcement officers without a valid judicial warrant. D. A person who is on any property that is owned by this state may not be questioned, detained or arrested by an immigration enforcement officer unless the immigration enforcement officer presents a valid judicial warrant that is applicable to the person. E. For the purposes of this section, "staging area" means an area that is used to ASSEMBLE, mobilize and deploy vehicles, equipment or materials and any related personnel for the purposes of carrying out civil immigration enforcement OPERATIONS. END_STATUTE